Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20161-121
Certified public accountant; fees; when payable.

The applicable fee shall be paid by the applicant at the time he or she applies for examination or reexamination.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 16, p. 60;

Laws 1991, LB 75, § 10;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 18;

Laws 2016, LB853, § 4.
July 21, 2016